Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2404
Grants; use.

The coalition shall make award recommendations to the commission,
at least annually, in accordance with the Juvenile Services Act and the federal
act for grants made under the Commission Grant Program. Such grants shall
be used to assist in
the implementation and operation of programs or services identified in the applicable comprehensive juvenile services
plan, to include: Programs
for local planning and service coordination; screening, assessment, and evaluation;
diversion; alternatives to detention; family support services; treatment services;
reentry services; truancy prevention and intervention programs; and other
services documented by data that will positively impact juveniles and families
in the juvenile justice system.

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 447, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 424, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 43;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 46.